Colorado, session 2026A, HB1091.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-4-125 as
follows:
10-4-125. Homeowner's insurance - consumer personal data
protections - licensee requirements - opt in to certain uses of data -
private right of action - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) Legislative declaration.
(a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DETERMINES THAT:
(I) A HOME IS FREQUENTLY A CONSUMER'S MOST EXPENSIVE AND
MOST IMPORTANT ASSET;
(II) SECURING HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TO PROTECT A HOME
FROM RISKS IS VITAL TO OBTAINING FINANCING TO PURCHASE A HOME,
RESULTING IN A LOSS OF BARGAINING POWER FOR A PURCHASER OF
HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE;
(III) PRIVACY IS VITALLY IMPORTANT IN THE CONTEXT OF THE
INSURANCE BUSINESS, AS INSURANCE COMPANIES REQUIRE SIGNIFICANT
-3- HB26-1091

AMOUNTS OF PERSONAL DATA FROM CONSUMERS OF INSURANCE TO
PROPERLY MANAGE RISKS;
(IV) CHANGES IN TECHNOLOGY ARE ALLOWING INSURANCE
COMPANIES TO USE MORE SOPHISTICATED METHODS TO COLLECT AND
PROCESS CONSUMER'S DATA;
(V) IN ADDITION, CHANGES IN THE STRUCTURE OF THE INSURANCE
INDUSTRY HAVE LED TO INCREASINGLY COMPLEX CONTRACTING
RELATIONSHIPS AMONG INSURANCE COMPANIES AND THE COMPANIES'
PROCESSORS AND AFFILIATES;
(VI) HOWEVER, INSURANCE DATA PRIVACY LAWS HAVE NOT KEPT
PACE WITH CHANGES IN THE INSURANCE MARKETPLACE; AND
(VII) CURRENTLY, CONSUMERS ARE PRESENTED WITH PRIVACY
NOTICES THAT ARE CONFUSING AND UNINFORMATIVE, POSSIBLY
SUBJECTING CONSUMERS TO THE OVERCOLLECTION OF THEIR PERSONAL
DATA, THE PROLIFERATION OF THAT DATA TO RECIPIENTS NOT
CONTEMPLATED BY THE CONSUMER, UNWANTED MARKETING CONTACTS,
FRAUD ARISING FROM DATA BREACHES, UNDERWRITING BASED ON STALE
DATA, OR RETALIATION FOR EXERCISING PRIVACY RIGHTS, AMONG OTHER
RISKS.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE PURPOSE OF
THIS SECTION IS TO ADDRESS GAPS IN CONSUMER PROTECTIONS RELATING
TO HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE AND TO GIVE THE COMMISSIONER AND
CONSUMERS POWERFUL TOOLS TO PROTECT CONSUMER PRIVACY, AS
FOLLOWS:
(I) ENSURING THAT INSURANCE COMPANIES PROCESS ONLY
PERSONAL DATA RELATING TO THE TRANSACTION REQUESTED BY THE
CONSUMER;
-4- HB26-1091

(II) ENSURING POLICIES ARE IN PLACE FOR RECORD RETENTION
AND DESTRUCTION OF PERSONAL DATA THAT IS NO LONGER NEEDED;
(III) ENSURING THAT VENDOR CONTRACTS BETWEEN INSURERS
AND PROCESSORS PROTECT THE SECURITY OF CONSUMERS' PERSONAL
DATA;
(IV) OPT-IN REQUIREMENTS SO THAT A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA IS USED ONLY TO PROVIDE THE INSURANCE PRODUCT REQUESTED BY
THE CONSUMER AND NOT FOR OTHER PURPOSES WITHOUT THE EXPRESS
CONSENT OF THE CONSUMER;
(V) REQUIRING REASONABLE NOTICE TO CONSUMERS WITH
MEANINGFUL INFORMATION ABOUT WHAT DATA IS COLLECTED, HOW IT IS
USED, TO WHOM IT IS DISCLOSED, AND WHAT RIGHTS THE CONSUMER HAS
UNDER THE LAW;
(VI) GOVERNANCE PROCESSES AND PROCEDURES ON DATA USE;
(VII) PROTECTING INSURANCE CONSUMERS' ACCESS TO
NONRETALIATION BY ENSURING THAT THEY HAVE REASONABLE ACCESS TO
THEIR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND ARE NOT RETALIATED AGAINST IN THE
PURCHASE OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE BY EXERCISING THEIR PRIVACY
RIGHTS;
(VIII) AUTHORIZING THE COMMISSIONER TO INVESTIGATE AND
TAKE ACTION AGAINST LICENSEES THAT VIOLATE CONSUMER PRIVACY
PROTECTIONS, INCLUDING ACTIONS BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
ENFORCE UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACTS OR PRACTICES IN THE BUSINESS OF
INSURANCE; AND
(IX) AUTHORIZING CONSUMERS TO BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST
A LICENSEE FOR VIOLATING THE DATA PRIVACY PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
-5- HB26-1091

(2) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "AFFILIATE" MEANS A LEGAL ENTITY THAT CONTROLS, IS
CONTROLLED BY, OR IS UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH ANOTHER LEGAL
ENTITY.
(II) AS USED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, "CONTROL"
MEANS:
(A) OWNERSHIP OF, CONTROL OF, OR POWER TO VOTE
TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OR MORE OF THE OUTSTANDING SHARES OF ANY
CLASS OF VOTING SECURITY OF THE ENTITY, WHETHER DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY OR ACTING THROUGH ONE OR MORE OTHER PERSONS;
(B) CONTROL IN ANY MANNER OVER THE ELECTION OF A MAJORITY
OF THE DIRECTORS, TRUSTEES, OR GENERAL PARTNERS OF THE ENTITY OR
OF INDIVIDUALS EXERCISING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS; OR
(C) THE POWER TO EXERCISE, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, A
CONTROLLING INFLUENCE OVER THE MANAGEMENT OR POLICIES OF THE
ENTITY AS DETERMINED BY THE APPLICABLE PRUDENTIAL REGULATOR, AS
THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN 12 U.S.C. SEC. 5481 (24), IF ANY.
(b) "AUTHENTICATE" MEANS TO USE REASONABLE MEANS TO
DETERMINE THAT A REQUEST TO EXERCISE A RIGHT SET FORTH IN THIS
SECTION IS BEING MADE ON BEHALF OF THE CONSUMER WHO IS ENTITLED
TO EXERCISE THE RIGHT.
(c) "CONSENT" MEANS A CLEAR, AFFIRMATIVE ACT SIGNIFYING A
CONSUMER'S FREELY GIVEN, SPECIFIC, INFORMED, AND UNAMBIGUOUS
AGREEMENT, SUCH AS BY A WRITTEN STATEMENT, INCLUDING BY
ELECTRONIC MEANS, OR OTHER CLEAR, AFFIRMATIVE ACTION BY WHICH
THE CONSUMER SIGNIFIES AGREEMENT TO THE PROCESSING OF PERSONAL
-6- HB26-1091

DATA. THE FOLLOWING DOES NOT CONSTITUTE CONSENT:
(I) ACCEPTANCE OF A GENERAL OR BROAD TERMS OF USE OR
SIMILAR DOCUMENT THAT CONTAINS DESCRIPTIONS OF PERSONAL DATA
PROCESSING ALONG WITH OTHER, UNRELATED INFORMATION;
(II) HOVERING OVER, MUTING, PAUSING, OR CLOSING A GIVEN
PIECE OF CONTENT; AND
(III) AGREEMENT OBTAINED THROUGH DARK PATTERNS.
(d) "CONSUMER" MEANS A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE APPLICANT,
AN INSURED, AND, WITH RESPECT TO THE RETENTION OF PERSONAL DATA,
A FORMERLY INSURED.
(e) "CREDIT REPORT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
10-4-116 (8)(h).
(f) "DARK PATTERN" MEANS A USER INTERFACE DESIGNED OR
MANIPULATED WITH THE SUBSTANTIAL EFFECT OF SUBVERTING OR
IMPAIRING USER AUTONOMY, DECISION-MAKING, OR CHOICE.
(g) "DE-IDENTIFIED DATA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1303 (11).
(h) "DELETE" OR "DELETION" MEANS TO REMOVE OR DESTROY
PERSONAL DATA BY PERMANENTLY ERASING THE PERSONAL DATA ON
EXISTING SYSTEMS SO THAT IT IS NOT MAINTAINED IN HUMAN- OR
MACHINE-READABLE FORM AND CANNOT BE RETRIEVED OR UTILIZED IN
THAT FORM.
(i) (I) "INSURANCE TRANSACTION" MEANS A TRANSACTION OR
SERVICE BY OR ON BEHALF OF A LICENSEE AND ITS AFFILIATES RELATED TO
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(A) THE UNDERWRITING OR THE DETERMINATION OF A
CONSUMER'S ELIGIBILITY FOR OR THE AMOUNT OF HOMEOWNER'S
-7- HB26-1091

INSURANCE COVERAGE, A RATE, A BENEFIT, A PAYMENT, OR A CLAIM
SETTLEMENT;
(B) LICENSEES OR PROCESSORS PERFORMING SERVICES, INCLUDING
MAINTAINING OR SERVICING ACCOUNTS, PROVIDING CUSTOMER SERVICE,
PROCESSING REQUESTS OR TRANSACTIONS, VERIFYING CUSTOMER
INFORMATION, PROCESSING PAYMENTS, PROVIDING FINANCING, PROVIDING
ANALYTIC SERVICES, PROVIDING STORAGE, OR ANY SIMILAR SERVICES;
(C) PROVISION OF VALUE-ADDED SERVICES OR BENEFITS IN
CONNECTION WITH THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE;
(D) AN ACTUARIAL STUDY RELATED TO RATING, RISK
MANAGEMENT, OR EXEMPT RESEARCH ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED BY OR FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE LICENSEE USING CONSUMERS' PERSONAL DATA;
(E) THE SHORT-TERM, TRANSIENT USE OF A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA IN CONNECTION WITH THE CONSUMER'S CURRENT INTERACTION WITH
THE LICENSEE, INCLUDING NONPERSONALIZED ADVERTISING SHOWN AS
PART OF A CONSUMER'S CURRENT INTERACTION WITH THE LICENSEE, IF THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA IS NOT OTHERWISE SHARED OR SOLD
WITHOUT CONSENT AND IS NOT USED TO BUILD A PROFILE ABOUT THE
CONSUMER OR OTHERWISE ALTER THE CONSUMER'S EXPERIENCE OUTSIDE
THE CURRENT INTERACTION WITH THE LICENSEE;
(F) DETECTION OR PREVENTION OF INSURANCE FRAUD, CRIME
RELATED TO INSURANCE CLAIMS, MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION, OR
MATERIAL NONDISCLOSURE; OR
(G) PROVIDING PERSONAL DATA TO STATISTICAL AGENTS OR
REINSURERS, PROVIDED THAT THE PERSONAL DATA IS ONLY USED FOR THE
PURPOSES FOR WHICH IT IS SHARED.
(II) "INSURANCE TRANSACTION" DOES NOT INCLUDE PROCESSING
-8- HB26-1091

RELATED TO MARKETING OR RESEARCH.
(j) (I) "LICENSEE" MEANS A PERSON LICENSED, REQUIRED TO BE
LICENSED, OR AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE IN CONNECTION
WITH THE TRANSACTION OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE BUSINESS,
INCLUDING:
(A) AN INSURER, INCLUDING THE FAIR ACCESS TO INSURANCE
REQUIREMENTS PLAN ASSOCIATION CREATED IN SECTION 10-4-1804;
(B) A PRODUCER;
(C) A SURPLUS LINE INSURER; AND
(D) A DIRECTOR, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF A LICENSEE.
(II) "LICENSEE" DOES NOT INCLUDE A PURCHASING GROUP OR A
RISK RETENTION GROUP CHARTERED AND LICENSED IN A STATE OTHER
THAN THIS STATE OR A LICENSEE THAT IS ACTING AS AN ASSUMING
INSURER THAT IS DOMICILED IN ANOTHER STATE OR JURISDICTION.
(k) "LOSS HISTORY INFORMATION REPORT" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 10-4-117 (2).
(l) (I) "PERSONAL DATA" MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION PROCESSED IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE THAT
IDENTIFIES, RELATES TO, DESCRIBES, IS REASONABLY CAPABLE OF BEING
ASSOCIATED WITH, OR COULD REASONABLY BE LINKED, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, WITH A PARTICULAR CONSUMER OR HOUSEHOLD, INCLUDING:
(A) IDENTIFIERS SUCH AS REAL NAME, ALIAS, SIGNATURE, POSTAL
ADDRESS, UNIQUE PERSONAL IDENTIFIER, ONLINE IDENTIFIER, INTERNET
PROTOCOL ADDRESS, EMAIL ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER, ACCOUNT
NAME, SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER, DRIVER'S LICENSE NUMBER, PASSPORT
NUMBER, OR OTHER SIMILAR IDENTIFIERS;
(B) COMMERCIAL DATA, INCLUDING RECORDS OF PERSONAL
-9- HB26-1091

PROPERTY, PRODUCTS, OR SERVICES PURCHASED, OBTAINED, OR
CONSIDERED, OTHER THAN PURCHASING OR CONSUMER HISTORIES OR
TENDENCIES;
(C) ACCOUNT LOGIN, FINANCIAL ACCOUNT NUMBER, DEBIT CARD
NUMBER, OR CREDIT CARD NUMBER IN COMBINATION WITH ANY REQUIRED
SECURITY ACCESS CODE, PASSWORD, OR CREDENTIALS ALLOWING ACCESS
TO AN ACCOUNT;
(D) INTERNET OR OTHER ELECTRONIC NETWORK ACTIVITY
INFORMATION, INCLUDING BROWSING HISTORY, SEARCH HISTORY, AND
INFORMATION REGARDING A CONSUMER'S INTERACTION WITH AN INTERNET
WEBSITE APPLICATION OR ADVERTISEMENT;
(E) A LOSS HISTORY INFORMATION REPORT;
(F) A CREDIT REPORT;
(G) AN INSURANCE SCORE;
(H) AN INSURANCE POLICY NUMBER;
(I) AN INSURANCE POLICY EXPIRATION DATE;
(J) PROFESSIONAL- OR EMPLOYMENT-RELATED INFORMATION;
(K) EDUCATION INFORMATION THAT IS NOT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE;
(L) PRECISE GEOLOCATION DATA;
(M) INFERENCES DRAWN FROM ANY OF THE INFORMATION
IDENTIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(l) TO CREATE A PROFILE ABOUT A
CONSUMER REFLECTING THE CONSUMER'S PREFERENCES,
CHARACTERISTICS, CHARACTER HABITS, AVOCATIONS, FINANCES,
OCCUPATION, GENERAL REPUTATION, CREDIT, PSYCHOLOGICAL TRENDS,
PREDISPOSITIONS, BEHAVIOR, ATTITUDES, INTELLIGENCE, ABILITIES, AND
APTITUDES;
(N) CHARACTERISTICS OF PROTECTED CLASSIFICATIONS PURSUANT
-10- HB26-1091

TO STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; AND
(O) RACIAL OR ETHNIC ORIGIN, CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION
STATUS, RELIGIOUS OR PHILOSOPHICAL BELIEFS, OR UNION MEMBERSHIP.
(II) "PERSONAL DATA" DOES NOT INCLUDE DE-IDENTIFIED DATA,
PSEUDONYMOUS DATA, PUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATA, OR LAWFULLY
OBTAINED, TRUTHFUL INFORMATION THAT IS A MATTER OF PUBLIC
CONCERN.
(m) "PRIVILEGED DATA" MEANS PERSONAL DATA THAT IS
COLLECTED IN CONNECTION WITH OR IN REASONABLE ANTICIPATION OF A
CLAIM FOR INSURANCE BENEFITS OR A CIVIL OR CRIMINAL PROCEEDING
INVOLVING A CONSUMER UNTIL THE CLAIM OR PROCEEDING IS FINALIZED;
EXCEPT THAT INFORMATION THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION SHALL NEVERTHELESS BE CONSIDERED PERSONAL DATA IF IT IS
DISCLOSED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(n) "PROCESS" OR "PROCESSING" MEANS THE USE, SALE, STORAGE,
DISCLOSURE, ANALYSIS, DELETION, OR MODIFICATION OF PERSONAL DATA
AND INCLUDES THE ACTIONS OF A LICENSEE DIRECTING A PROCESSOR TO
PROCESS PERSONAL DATA.
(o) "PROCESSOR" MEANS A PERSON THAT PROCESSES PERSONAL
DATA ON BEHALF OF A LICENSEE.
(p) "PRODUCER" MEANS A PERSON THAT SOLICITS, NEGOTIATES,
EFFECTS, PROCURES, DELIVERS, RENEWS, CONTINUES, OR BINDS POLICIES
OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE.
(q) "PSEUDONYMOUS DATA" MEANS PERSONAL DATA THAT
CANNOT BE ATTRIBUTED TO A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL WITHOUT THE USE OF
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION, PROVIDED THE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION IS
KEPT SEPARATELY AND IS SUBJECT TO APPROPRIATE TECHNICAL AND
-11- HB26-1091

ORGANIZATIONAL MEASURES TO ENSURE THAT THE PERSONAL DATA IS NOT
ATTRIBUTABLE TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL.
(r) "PUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATA" MEANS DATA RELATING TO A
CONSUMER THAT A LICENSEE HAS A REASONABLE BASIS TO BELIEVE IS
LAWFULLY MADE AVAILABLE FROM ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT RECORDS;
(II) WIDELY DISTRIBUTED MEDIA; OR
(III) DISCLOSURES TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC THAT ARE REQUIRED
TO BE MADE PURSUANT TO FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW.
(s) "RETAIN" OR "RETENTION" MEANS STORING OR ARCHIVING
PERSONAL DATA THAT IS IN THE CONTINUOUS POSSESSION, USE, OR
CONTROL OF A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR.
(t) (I) "SALE OF PERSONAL DATA" OR "SELL PERSONAL DATA"
MEANS THE EXCHANGE OF A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA TO A THIRD
PARTY FOR MONETARY OR OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION.
(II) "SALE OF PERSONAL DATA" OR "SELL PERSONAL DATA" DOES
NOT INCLUDE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING SHARING OF PERSONAL DATA:
(A) DISCLOSING PERSONAL DATA TO A PROCESSOR THAT
PROCESSES THE PERSONAL DATA ON BEHALF OF A LICENSEE;
(B) DISCLOSING PERSONAL DATA TO A THIRD PARTY FOR PURPOSES
OF PROVIDING A PRODUCT OR SERVICE SPECIFICALLY REQUESTED BY A
CONSUMER;
(C) DISCLOSING PERSONAL DATA TO AN AFFILIATE OF A LICENSEE;
(D) DISCLOSING PERSONAL DATA PURSUANT TO A CONSUMER'S
DIRECTION TO A LICENSEE TO DISCLOSE PERSONAL DATA TO, OR INTERACT
WITH, ONE OR MORE LICENSEES, A REINSURER, OR A THIRD PARTY;
(E) TRANSFERRING PERSONAL DATA TO A THIRD PARTY AS AN
-12- HB26-1091

ASSET PURSUANT TO A MERGER, ACQUISITION, BANKRUPTCY, OR OTHER
TRANSACTION, OR A PROPOSED MERGER, ACQUISITION, BANKRUPTCY, OR
OTHER TRANSACTION, IN WHICH THE THIRD PARTY ASSUMES CONTROL OF
ALL OR PART OF A LICENSEE'S ASSETS; OR
(F) THE DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL DATA THAT A CONSUMER
INTENTIONALLY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC VIA A
CHANNEL OF MASS MEDIA.
(u) "SHARE" OR "SHARING" MEANS SHARING, RENTING, RELEASING,
DISCLOSING, DISSEMINATING, MAKING AVAILABLE, TRANSFERRING, OR
OTHERWISE COMMUNICATING ORALLY, IN WRITING, OR BY ELECTRONIC OR
OTHER MEANS A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA BY A LICENSEE OR
PROCESSOR TO A THIRD PARTY, WHETHER OR NOT FOR MONETARY OR
OTHER VALUABLE CONSIDERATION, INCLUDING TRANSACTIONS BETWEEN
A LICENSEE AND A THIRD PARTY, FOR THE BENEFIT OF ANY PERSON, IN
WHICH NO MONEY IS EXCHANGED.
(v) "TARGETED ADVERTISING" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1303 (25).
(w) "THIRD PARTY" MEANS A PERSON, PUBLIC AUTHORITY,
AGENCY, OR BODY OTHER THAN THE CONSUMER, LICENSEE, PROCESSOR,
OR AFFILIATE OF THE LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR.
(x) "VALUE-ADDED SERVICE OR BENEFIT" MEANS A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE THAT RELATES TO HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE APPLIED FOR OR
PURCHASED BY A CONSUMER THAT IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED TO:
(I) PROVIDE LOSS MITIGATION OR LOSS CONTROL TO MITIGATE
RISKS RELATED TO THE HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE REQUESTED BY OR
OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER;
(II) REDUCE CLAIM COSTS OR CLAIM SETTLEMENT COSTS;
-13- HB26-1091

(III) PROVIDE EDUCATION ABOUT LIABILITY RISKS OR RISK OF LOSS
TO PERSONS OR PROPERTY;
(IV) MONITOR OR ASSESS RISK, IDENTIFY SOURCES OF RISK, OR
DEVELOP STRATEGIES FOR ELIMINATING OR REDUCING RISK; OR
(V) PROVIDE POST-LOSS SERVICES.
(3) Applicability of section.
(a) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A
LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR THAT:
(I) PROCESSES CONSUMERS' PERSONAL DATA IN CONNECTION WITH
A POLICY OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE;
(II) ENGAGES IN HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TRANSACTIONS WITH
CONSUMERS; OR
(III) ENGAGES IN ACTIVITIES NOT RELATED TO HOMEOWNER'S
INSURANCE TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
CONSUMERS' PERSONAL DATA.
(b) THE PROTECTIONS OF THIS SECTION EXTEND TO A CONSUMER:
(I) WHOSE PERSONAL DATA IS PROCESSED IN CONNECTION WITH A
HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TRANSACTION;
(II) WHO HAS PREVIOUSLY ENGAGED IN HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
TRANSACTIONS WITH A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR INVOLVING THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA; OR
(III) WHOSE PERSONAL DATA IS USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN
HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TRANSACTIONS BY LICENSEES AND
PROCESSORS.
(c) AN AFFILIATE THAT PROCESSES PERSONAL DATA RECEIVED
FROM, OR ON BEHALF OF, A LICENSEE IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO A
-14- HB26-1091

LICENSEE.
(d) THE OBLIGATIONS IMPOSED BY THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY TO
DEPOSITORY INSTITUTIONS OR AFFILIATES OF DEPOSITORY INSTITUTIONS
THAT ARE SUBJECT TO THE FEDERAL "GRAMM-LEACH-BLILEY ACT", 15
U.S.C. SEC. 6801 ET SEQ., UNLESS THE AFFILIATES ARE LICENSEES FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(4) Right to access, correct, and delete personal data - right to
opt in to certain activities regarding personal data - rules.
(a) NO LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2028, A HOMEOWNER'S
INSURANCE CONSUMER HAS THE RIGHT TO:
(I) CONFIRM WHETHER A LICENSEE IS PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
CONCERNING THE CONSUMER AND TO ACCESS THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA;
(II) TAKING INTO ACCOUNT THE NATURE OF THE PERSONAL DATA
AND THE PURPOSE FOR PROCESSING THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA:
(A) REQUEST A CORRECTION OR AMENDMENT OF INACCURATE OR
INCOMPLETE PERSONAL DATA ABOUT THE CONSUMER; AND
(B) REQUEST THE DELETION OF PERSONAL DATA THAT IS NOT
NEEDED FOR THE COMPLETION OF THE HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
TRANSACTION OR FOR SPECIFIC PRODUCTS OR SERVICES FOR WHICH THE
CONSUMER HAS PROVIDED CONSENT;
(III) WHEN EXERCISING THE RIGHT TO ACCESS PERSONAL DATA
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, OBTAIN FROM THE
LICENSEE THE PERSONAL DATA IN A PORTABLE AND, TO THE EXTENT
TECHNICALLY FEASIBLE, READILY USABLE FORMAT THAT ALLOWS THE
CONSUMER TO TRANSMIT THE DATA TO ANOTHER ENTITY WITHOUT
HINDRANCE, SO LONG AS THE LICENSEE IS NOT REQUIRED TO REVEAL ANY
-15- HB26-1091

TRADE SECRET; AND
(IV) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, OPT IN TO
THE PROCESSING OF THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA FOR PURPOSES OF:
(A) THE SHARING OF PERSONAL DATA UNRELATED TO THE
INSURANCE TRANSACTION;
(B) THE SALE OF PERSONAL DATA;
(C) TARGETED ADVERTISING; AND
(D) JOINT MARKETING OF COBRANDED FINANCIAL PRODUCTS.
(b) A LICENSEE PROVIDING AN OPT-IN PROCESS REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION OR OTHERWISE
OBTAINING CONSENT REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL
PROVIDE TO A CONSUMER A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS NOTICE OF THE TYPE
AND USE OF PERSONAL DATA THAT THE LICENSEE WOULD BE ABLE TO
PROCESS IF THE CONSUMER OPTS IN OR CONSENTS AND A PROCESS FOR THE
CONSUMER TO REVOKE CONSENT AS EASILY AS IT WAS AFFIRMATIVELY
PROVIDED.
(c) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT RULES RELATING TO THE
FORM AND MANNER FOR IMPLEMENTING THE CONSUMER RIGHTS SET FORTH
IN THIS SUBSECTION (4).
(5) Duties of licensees - consumer data privacy notice - consent
- prohibited actions.
(a) A LICENSEE SHALL ENSURE THAT A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA IS NOT PROCESSED, RETAINED, OR SHARED WITHOUT THE
CONSUMER'S CONSENT FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THOSE REASONABLY
NECESSARY TO TRANSACT HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE BUSINESS AND FOR
PRODUCTS OR SERVICES RELATED TO HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE THAT ARE
SPECIFICALLY REQUESTED BY THE CONSUMER.
-16- HB26-1091

(b) (I) A LICENSEE SHALL CREATE A REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE,
CLEAR, AND MEANINGFUL CONSUMER DATA PRIVACY NOTICE AND
DISTRIBUTE THE NOTICE TO EACH CONSUMER WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME
AFTER THE LICENSEE, DIRECTLY OR THROUGH A PROCESSOR, FIRST
COLLECTS, PROCESSES, OR SHARES THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA.
(II) THE CONSUMER DATA PRIVACY NOTICE MUST STATE IN
WRITING ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:
(A) THAT PERSONAL DATA HAS BEEN OR MAY BE COLLECTED BY
THE LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR FROM SOURCES OTHER THAN THE
CONSUMER;
(B) THE OTHER SOURCES THAT HAVE BEEN OR MAY BE USED TO
COLLECT PERSONAL DATA;
(C) THE CATEGORIES OF THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA THAT
THE LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR HAVE PROCESSED OR MAY PROCESS,
INCLUDING EXAMPLES OF THE DATA IN EACH CATEGORY;
(D) THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE LICENSEE PROCESSES THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA;
(E) THAT THE LICENSEE AND A PROCESSOR MAY SHARE THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA FOR PURPOSES OF THE INSURANCE
TRANSACTION;
(F) THE CATEGORIES OF PERSONS WITH WHOM THE LICENSEE OR A
PROCESSOR HAS SHARED, OR MAY SHARE, THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA;
(G) THAT THE CONSUMER MAY, UPON REQUEST, ANNUALLY
OBTAIN A LIST OF PERSONS WITH WHOM THE LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR
HAS SHARED THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA WITHIN THE LAST TWELVE
MONTHS;
-17- HB26-1091

(H) THAT THE CONSUMER'S PRIOR CONSENT IS REQUIRED FOR THE
LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR TO PROCESS THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA
FOR ANY PURPOSES UNRELATED TO THE INSURANCE TRANSACTION OR TO
SELL PERSONAL DATA;
(I) A STATEMENT OF THE CONSUMER'S RIGHTS OF NONRETALIATION
ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (13) OF THIS SECTION;
(J) A STATEMENT OF THE RIGHTS OF THE CONSUMER TO ACCESS,
CORRECT, AMEND, OR DELETE PERSONAL DATA ABOUT THE CONSUMER,
AND THE INSTRUCTIONS FOR EXERCISING THOSE RIGHTS;
(K) A STATEMENT OF THE RIGHTS OF THE CONSUMER TO RECEIVE
NOTICE REGARDING AN ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION, INCLUDING
THE REASONS FOR THE ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION, THE SPECIFIC
DATA UNDERLYING THE ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION, AND THE
SOURCES OF THE DATA;
(L) A STATEMENT OF THE CONSUMER'S RIGHT TO PROVIDE
CONSENT BEFORE THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA MAY BE PROCESSED
IN A JURISDICTION OUTSIDE OF THE UNITED STATES OR ITS TERRITORIES;
EXCEPT THAT THE REQUIREMENT IN THIS SUBSECTION (5)(b)(II)(L) DOES
NOT APPLY IF THE ONLY SHARING OR PROCESSING IS IN CONNECTION WITH
A REINSURANCE TRANSACTION OR WITH AN AFFILIATE OF THE LICENSEE;
(M) HOW A CONSUMER MAY CONTACT A LICENSEE BY MAIL,
TELEPHONE, AND ACTIVE EMAIL ADDRESS OR OTHER ONLINE MECHANISM;
AND
(N) ADDITIONAL ITEMS THAT THE COMMISSIONER SPECIFIES BY
RULE.
(III) IF THE LICENSEE INTENDS TO SHARE A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA FOR PURPOSES UNRELATED TO THE INSURANCE TRANSACTION OR TO
-18- HB26-1091

SELL PERSONAL DATA, IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE CONSUMER
PRIVACY NOTICE MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A DESCRIPTION OF THE REASONABLE MEANS BY WHICH A
CONSUMER MAY OPT IN OR OTHERWISE INDICATE THEIR CONSENT FOR ANY
ONE OR MORE OF THOSE PURPOSES; AND
(B) THAT ONCE THE CONSUMER CONSENTS TO THE SHARING OR
SALE OF PERSONAL DATA, THE CONSUMER MAY REVOKE THE CONSENT AT
ANY TIME AND THAT THE LICENSEE WILL NO LONGER SHARE OR SELL THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA FOR THOSE PURPOSES.
(IV) THE OBLIGATIONS IMPOSED BY THIS SECTION UPON A
LICENSEE MAY BE SATISFIED BY ANOTHER LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR
AUTHORIZED TO ACT ON THE LICENSEE'S BEHALF.
(c) A LICENSEE AND PROCESSOR SHALL TAKE REASONABLE STEPS
TO SECURE PERSONAL DATA DURING BOTH STORAGE AND USE FROM
UNAUTHORIZED ACQUISITION. A LICENSEE'S DATA SECURITY PRACTICES
MUST BE APPROPRIATE TO THE VOLUME, SCOPE, AND NATURE OF THE
PERSONAL DATA PROCESSED TO TRANSACT HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
BUSINESS.
(6) Form of consent.
(a) TO COMPLY WITH THE OPT-IN OR CONSENT REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION, A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR SHALL USE A METHOD OF
CAPTURING A CONSUMER'S CONSENT THAT IS CAPABLE OF BEING
RECORDED OR MAINTAINED FOR AS LONG AS THE LICENSEE HAS A BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP WITH A CONSUMER OR A METHOD REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION.
(b) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT REQUIRE A CONSUMER TO CREATE A
-19- HB26-1091

NEW ACCOUNT IN ORDER TO EXERCISE A RIGHT SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION
(4) OR (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) (I) WHEN A CONSUMER HAS A CHOICE TO OPT IN OR PROVIDE
PRIOR CONSENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE FORM USED TO OBTAIN
THE CONSUMER'S CONSENT MUST:
(A) BE WRITTEN IN PLAIN LANGUAGE;
(B) BE DATED AND, IF THE CONSENT RELATES TO THE SHARING OR
USE OF PERSONAL DATA OF A CONSUMER WITH WHOM THE LICENSEE HAS
NO ONGOING RELATIONSHIP PURSUANT TO A CLAIM UNDER THE LICENSEE'S
POLICY, CONTAIN A TERMINATION DATE FOR THE CONSENT;
(C) NAME THE LICENSEE THAT THE CONSUMER AUTHORIZES TO
SHARE THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA;
(D) SPECIFY TO WHOM THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA WILL BE
SHARED CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION;
(E) SPECIFY THE TYPES AND USES OF THE PERSONAL DATA THAT
THE CONSUMER IS AUTHORIZING TO BE SHARED;
(F) ADVISE THE CONSUMER THAT THE CONSUMER IS ENTITLED TO
RECEIVE A COPY OF THE FORM CONTAINING THE CONSUMER'S CONSENT;
(G) EXPLAIN THAT, PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (13) OF THIS
SECTION, THE CONSUMER IS PROTECTED FROM RETALIATION,
DISCRIMINATION, OR DISPARATE TREATMENT BASED ON THE CONSUMER'S
DECISION TO PROVIDE OR WITHHOLD CONSENT; AND
(H) INCLUDE ADDITIONAL DATA OR ELEMENTS SPECIFIED BY THE
COMMISSIONER BY RULE.
(II) THE CONSUMER'S MOST RECENT CONSENT SHALL TAKE
PRECEDENCE OVER ANY PRIOR CONSENT.
(III) A CONSUMER'S CONSENT GIVEN PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION
-20- HB26-1091

IS EFFECTIVE UNTIL IT IS REVOKED BY THE CONSUMER, BUT CONSENT
PROVIDED BY A CONSUMER WITH WHOM A LICENSEE HAS NO ONGOING
CUSTOMER RELATIONSHIP IS ONLY VALID FOR THE DURATION SPECIFIED ON
THE CONSENT DOCUMENT.
(IV) IF A CONSUMER ESTABLISHES A NEW RELATIONSHIP WITH A
LICENSEE, ANY CONSENT THAT APPLIED TO THE FORMER RELATIONSHIP
DOES NOT APPLY TO THE NEW RELATIONSHIP. A NEW RELATIONSHIP
OCCURS WHEN THE CONSUMER WHO PREVIOUSLY ENDED ALL BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIPS WITH A LICENSEE REESTABLISHES A BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP MORE THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE PREVIOUS BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP ENDED.
(V) IF TWO OR MORE CONSUMERS JOINTLY OBTAIN HOMEOWNER'S
INSURANCE OR ANOTHER PRODUCT OR SERVICE FROM A LICENSEE, THE
LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR MAY PROVIDE A SINGLE CONSENT NOTICE.
EACH OF THE JOINT CONSUMERS SHALL INDICATE THEIR CONSENT.
(7) Designated agent - authorization.
(a) A CONSUMER MAY DESIGNATE ANOTHER PERSON, ACTING ON
THE CONSUMER'S BEHALF TO EXERCISE THE CONSUMER'S RIGHTS,
INCLUDING PROVIDING CONSENT WHERE REQUIRED AND OPTING IN TO
LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR ACTIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS (4) AND (5)
OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR SHALL COMPLY WITH ACTIONS
TAKEN BY A CONSUMER'S DESIGNATED AGENT IF THE LICENSEE IS ABLE TO
AUTHENTICATE, WITH COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE EFFORT, THE
IDENTITY OF THE CONSUMER AND THE AUTHORITY OF THE AUTHORIZED
AGENT TO ACT ON THE CONSUMER'S BEHALF.
(8) Requirements for processing consumer's personal data -
-21- HB26-1091

prohibitions.
(a) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT PROCESS A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA UNLESS:
(I) THE PROCESSING, RETENTION, OR SHARING OF THE CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA IS CONSISTENT WITH AND COMPLIES WITH THE MOST
RECENT DATA PRIVACY NOTICE PROVIDED TO THE CONSUMER BY THE
LICENSEE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE PROCESSING AND RETENTION OF THE CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA IS REASONABLY NECESSARY AND PROPORTIONATE TO
ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES RELATED TO A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
TRANSACTION OR OTHER PURPOSE THE CONSUMER REQUESTED OR
AUTHORIZED AND NOT FURTHER PROCESSED IN A MANNER THAT IS
INCOMPATIBLE WITH THOSE PURPOSES.
(b) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT PERMIT AN EMPLOYEE TO PROCESS,
RETAIN, OR SHARE A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA, EXCEPT AS RELEVANT
AND NECESSARY AS PART OF THAT EMPLOYEE'S ASSIGNED DUTIES.
(c) A REINSURER, PROCESSOR, OR SURPLUS LINE INSURER SHALL
NOT PROCESS A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA UNLESS:
(I) THE PROCESSING IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION;
(II) THE PROCESSING OF THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA IS
CONSISTENT WITH AND COMPLIES WITH THE MOST RECENT PRIVACY
NOTICE PROVIDED BY THE REINSURER, PROCESSOR, OR SURPLUS LINE
INSURER ON ITS INTERNET WEBSITE;
(III) WITH RESPECT TO REINSURERS, THE PROCESSING OF THE
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA IS REASONABLY NECESSARY AND
PROPORTIONATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES RELATED TO THE
REINSURANCE TRANSACTION AND NOT FURTHER PROCESSED IN A MANNER
-22- HB26-1091

THAT IS INCOMPATIBLE WITH THOSE PURPOSES; AND
(IV) WITH RESPECT TO PROCESSORS AND SURPLUS LINE INSURERS,
THE PROCESSING OF THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA IS REASONABLY
NECESSARY AND PROPORTIONATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES RELATED TO
THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE PROCESSOR OR SURPLUS LINE INSURER
COLLECTED THE DATA AND NOT FURTHER PROCESSED IN A MANNER THAT
IS INCOMPATIBLE WITH THOSE PURPOSES.
(d) OTHER THAN PROCESSING PURSUANT TO A CONTRACT WITH A
LICENSEE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (10) OF THIS SECTION, A REINSURER,
PROCESSOR, OR SURPLUS LINE INSURER SHALL NOT PROCESS A CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA OBTAINED IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE FOR A
PURPOSE UNRELATED TO AN INSURANCE TRANSACTION.
(9) Authorized processing of personal data.
(a) CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION, A LICENSEE MAY PROCESS A
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA AS NECESSARY FOR THE FOLLOWING
PURPOSES:
(I) IN CONNECTION WITH AN INSURANCE TRANSACTION;
(II) FOR COMPLIANCE WITH A REQUEST OR DIRECTIVE FROM A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR INSURANCE REGULATORY AUTHORITY OR AN
ADMINISTRATIVE, CRIMINAL, OR CIVIL LEGAL PROCESS, ARBITRATION, OR
OTHER LEGAL REQUIREMENT OR ORDER THAT IS BINDING UPON THE
LICENSEE;
(III) WHEN SPECIFICALLY REQUIRED BY STATE LAW;
(IV) FOR A LIENHOLDER, MORTGAGEE, ASSIGNEE, LESSOR, OR
OTHER PERSON SHOWN IN THE RECORDS OF A LICENSEE AS HAVING A
LEGAL OR BENEFICIAL INTEREST IN AN INSURANCE POLICY, TO PROTECT
THAT INTEREST, IF THE PERSONAL DATA SHARED IS LIMITED TO WHAT IS
-23- HB26-1091

REASONABLY NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE REQUESTOR'S LEGAL INTERESTS
IN THE POLICY;
(V) TO PERMIT A PARTY OR A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PARTY TO A
PROPOSED OR CONSUMMATED SALE, TRANSFER, MERGER, OR
CONSOLIDATION OF ALL OR PART OF THE BUSINESS OF THE LICENSEE TO
REVIEW THE PERSONAL DATA NECESSARY FOR THE TRANSACTION, IF:
(A) BEFORE THE CONSUMMATION OF THE SALE, TRANSFER,
MERGER, OR CONSOLIDATION, PERSONAL DATA IS ONLY SHARED AS IS
REASONABLY NECESSARY TO ENABLE THE RECIPIENT TO MAKE BUSINESS
DECISIONS ABOUT THE SALE, TRANSFER, MERGER, OR CONSOLIDATION;
AND
(B) THE RECIPIENT AGREES NOT TO SHARE THE ACQUIRED
PERSONAL DATA FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THE SALE, TRANSFER,
MERGER, OR CONSOLIDATION;
(VI) IN CONNECTION WITH THE MARKETING OF A PRODUCT OR
SERVICE, AFTER RECEIVING AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT FROM THE CONSUMER
TO USE THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA IN CONNECTION WITH THE
SPECIFIC MARKETING ACTIVITY TO WHICH THE CONSUMER HAS
CONSENTED;
(VII) IN CONNECTION WITH THE JOINT MARKETING OF COBRANDED
FINANCIAL PRODUCTS OR SERVICES BETWEEN A LICENSEE AND A
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, IF:
(A) THE CONSUMER OPTS IN TO THE JOINT MARKETING ACTIVITY;
(B) PERSONAL DATA IS ONLY PROCESSED PURSUANT TO A
CONTRACT COMPLYING WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (10) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(C) ONLY THE FOLLOWING ELEMENTS OF PERSONAL DATA ARE
-24- HB26-1091

SHARED AND PROCESSED FOR PURPOSES OF THE JOINT MARKETING: THE
CONSUMER'S NAME, ADDRESS OR EMAIL ADDRESS, FINANCIAL INSTITUTION
AFFILIATION, AND ACCOUNT TYPE; AND
(VIII) ADDITIONAL PURPOSES SPECIFIED BY THE COMMISSIONER BY
RULE.
(b) A LICENSEE MAY PROCESS A CONSUMER'S DE-IDENTIFIED DATA.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (9) DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE SHARING OF A
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA WITH A LICENSEE'S AFFILIATES TO THE
EXTENT PREEMPTED BY SECTION 15 U.S.C. SEC. 1681t (b)(1)(H) OR 1681t
(b)(2).
(10) Contracts between licensees and processors.
(a) A LICENSEE SHALL EXERCISE DUE DILIGENCE IN SELECTING AND
OVERSEEING THE LICENSEE'S PROCESSORS. A LICENSEE SHALL DEVELOP
WRITTEN PROCEDURES FOR THE SELECTION AND OVERSIGHT OF
PROCESSORS AND SHALL MAKE THE PROCEDURES AVAILABLE TO THE
COMMISSIONER UPON REQUEST. A LICENSEE'S PROCEDURES DEVELOPED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (10) ARE NOT A PUBLIC RECORD AND ARE
EXEMPT FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION AND COPYING UNDER THE "COLORADO
OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
(b) PROCESSING BY A PROCESSOR MUST BE GOVERNED BY A
CONTRACT BETWEEN THE LICENSEE AND THE PROCESSOR THAT IS BINDING
ON BOTH PARTIES. THE CONTRACT MUST CONTAIN CLEAR INSTRUCTIONS
FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA, THE NATURE AND PURPOSE OF
PROCESSING, THE TYPES OF PERSONAL DATA SUBJECT TO PROCESSING, THE
DURATION OF PROCESSING, AND THE RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF BOTH
PARTIES. THE CONTRACT MUST ALSO INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS THAT THE
PROCESSOR DO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:
-25- HB26-1091

(I) ENSURE THAT EACH PERSON PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA IS
SUBJECT TO A DUTY OF CONFIDENTIALITY WITH RESPECT TO THE PERSONAL
DATA AND ONLY USES THE PERSONAL DATA FOR LEGITIMATE DUTIES AS
ASSIGNED;
(II) DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A PROGRAM OF ADMINISTRATIVE,
TECHNICAL, AND PHYSICAL SAFEGUARDS SUFFICIENT TO ENSURE THE
CONFIDENTIALITY, INTEGRITY, AND AVAILABILITY OF PERSONAL DATA
PROVIDED BY THE LICENSEE;
(III) PROMPTLY REPORT TO THE LICENSEE AND THE COMMISSIONER
ANY INCIDENT AFFECTING THE CONFIDENTIALITY, INTEGRITY, OR
AVAILABILITY OF PERSONAL DATA, INCLUDING A BREACH IN THE SECURITY
OF PERSONAL DATA;
(IV) AT THE CHOICE OF THE LICENSEE, DELETE OR RETURN ALL
PERSONAL DATA TO THE LICENSEE AS REQUESTED AT THE END OF THE
PROVISION OF SERVICES, UNLESS RETENTION OF THE PERSONAL DATA IS
REQUIRED BY LAW OR THE LICENSEE REQUESTS AN EARLIER DELETION
DATE;
(V) UPON THE REASONABLE REQUEST OF THE LICENSEE, MAKE
AVAILABLE TO THE LICENSEE ALL INFORMATION IN THE PROCESSOR'S
POSSESSION NECESSARY TO DEMONSTRATE THE PROCESSOR'S COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION;
(VI) PROVIDE REASONABLE ASSISTANCE TO THE COMMISSIONER
WITH RESPECT TO AN INVESTIGATION OR PROCEEDING PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION OR TO THE LICENSEE WITH RESPECT TO A CONSUMER REQUEST
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION;
(VII) ENGAGE A SUBCONTRACTOR PURSUANT TO A WRITTEN
CONTRACT THAT REQUIRES THE SUBCONTRACTOR TO COMPLY WITH THE
-26- HB26-1091

SAME OBLIGATIONS AS THE PROCESSOR WITH RESPECT TO THE PERSONAL
DATA;
(VIII) NOT FURTHER PROCESS OR DISCLOSE THE PERSONAL DATA
OBTAINED FROM OR ON BEHALF OF THE LICENSEE OTHER THAN AS
SPECIFICALLY STATED IN THE CONTRACT; AND
(IX) PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE LICENSEE IF THE PROCESSOR IS NO
LONGER ABLE TO COMPLY WITH THE PROCESSOR'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER
THE CONTRACT, IN WHICH CASE THE LICENSEE HAS THE RIGHT TO
TERMINATE THE CONTRACT.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (10)(b) OF THIS SECTION, IN
CONNECTION WITH AN INSURANCE TRANSACTION, A LICENSEE MAY SHARE
A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA WITH A PROCESSOR WITH WHICH THE
LICENSEE HAS NO ONGOING BUSINESS RELATIONSHIP AND WITH WHICH THE
LICENSEE HAS NO WRITTEN CONTRACT UPON RECEIVING THE CONSENT OF
THE CONSUMER AND ONLY TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO PROVIDE THE
TEMPORARY SERVICE REQUESTED BY THE LICENSEE ON BEHALF OF THE
CONSUMER.
(d) A PROCESSOR SHALL ALLOW FOR, AND CONTRIBUTE TO,
REASONABLE AUDITS AND INSPECTIONS BY THE LICENSEE OR THE
LICENSEE'S DESIGNATED AUDITOR. ALTERNATIVELY, THE PROCESSOR MAY,
WITH THE LICENSEE'S CONSENT, ARRANGE FOR A QUALIFIED AND
INDEPENDENT AUDITOR TO CONDUCT, AT LEAST ANNUALLY AND AT THE
PROCESSOR'S EXPENSE, AN AUDIT OF THE PROCESSOR'S POLICIES AND
TECHNICAL AND ORGANIZATIONAL MEASURES IN SUPPORT OF THE
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION USING AN APPROPRIATE AND ACCEPTED
CONTROL STANDARD OR FRAMEWORK AND AUDIT PROCEDURE FOR THE
AUDITS AS APPLICABLE. THE PROCESSOR SHALL PROVIDE A REPORT OF THE
-27- HB26-1091

AUDIT TO THE LICENSEE UPON REQUEST.
(e) THIS SUBSECTION (10) APPLIES TO A CONTRACT BETWEEN A
LICENSEE AND A PROCESSOR THAT IS EXECUTED, AMENDED, OR RENEWED
ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028. IF A LICENSEE HAS AN IN-FORCE
CONTRACT WITH A PROCESSOR THAT PROCESSES, RETAINS, OR SHARES ANY
CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA AND THE CONTRACT HAS NOT BEEN
RENEWED AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE LICENSEE
SHALL NOTIFY THE PROCESSOR OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(f) IN NO EVENT MAY A CONTRACT RELIEVE A LICENSEE OR A
PROCESSOR FROM THE LIABILITIES IMPOSED ON THEM BY VIRTUE OF THEIR
ROLE IN THE PROCESSING RELATIONSHIP AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(11) Retention of personal data.
(a) A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR MAY RETAIN A CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA AS NECESSARY FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) PERFORMANCE OF A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TRANSACTION,
PRODUCT, OR SERVICE WITH A CONSUMER WHO IS IN AN ONGOING BUSINESS
RELATIONSHIP WITH THE LICENSEE AND WHO, IF REQUIRED, HAS
CONSENTED TO OR OPTED IN TO THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(II) COMPLIANCE WITH A LEGAL OBLIGATION OF THE LICENSEE
RELATED TO THE INSURANCE TRANSACTION INVOLVING THE CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA;
(III) COMPLIANCE WITH A REQUEST OR DIRECTIVE FROM A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR STATE, FEDERAL, OR INTERNATIONAL
REGULATORY AUTHORITY; A WARRANT, A SUBPOENA, A DISCOVERY
REQUEST, A JUDICIAL ORDER, OR OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE, CRIMINAL, OR
CIVIL LEGAL PROCESS; OR ANOTHER LEGAL REQUIREMENT THAT IS BINDING
UPON A LICENSEE;
-28- HB26-1091

(IV) PROTECTION OF A LEGAL OR BENEFICIAL INTEREST IN AN
INSURANCE POLICY, WITH RESPECT TO A LIENHOLDER, A MORTGAGEE, AN
ASSIGNEE, A LESSOR, OR OTHER PERSON SHOWN ON THE RECORDS OF A
LICENSEE AS HAVING A LEGAL OR BENEFICIAL INTEREST IN THE INSURANCE
POLICY;
(V) EXEMPT RESEARCH ACTIVITIES RELATED TO AN INSURANCE
TRANSACTION INVOLVING THE CONSUMER'S PERSONAL DATA, OR FOR
RATING OR RISK MANAGEMENT PURPOSES FOR OR ON BEHALF OF THE
LICENSEE IN CONNECTION WITH A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE PRODUCT OR
SERVICE;
(VI) IDENTIFICATION OF BENEFICIARIES OF UNCLAIMED INSURANCE
POLICY BENEFITS; AND
(VII) OTHER PURPOSES THAT THE COMMISSIONER IDENTIFIES BY
RULE.
(b) (I) NOT LESS THAN ANNUALLY, A LICENSEE AND PROCESSOR
SHALL REVIEW ANY RECORDS CONTAINING PERSONAL DATA TO DETERMINE
WHETHER ANY OF THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (11)(a) OF THIS
SECTION PERMIT THE CONTINUING RETENTION OF A CONSUMER'S PERSONAL
DATA.
(II) ONCE A LICENSEE HAS DETERMINED THAT A CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA, OR A SPECIFIC ELEMENT OF PERSONAL DATA, IS NO
LONGER NEEDED, THE LICENSEE SHALL DESTROY THE CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER MAKING THE
DETERMINATION.
(III) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE COMMISSIONER, IF A
LICENSEE'S SYSTEMS DO NOT ALLOW THE TARGETED DESTRUCTION OF
PERSONAL DATA, THE LICENSEE SHALL:
-29- HB26-1091

(A) DEVELOP A WRITTEN PLAN THAT PROVIDES FOR
TRANSITIONING FROM THE EXISTING SYSTEMS WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME
FRAME; AND
(B) REPORT PROGRESS TO THE COMMISSIONER.
(IV) A LICENSEE SHALL DEVELOP A WRITTEN DATA RETENTION
POLICY AND DATA RETENTION SCHEDULE AND SHALL MAKE THE POLICY
AND SCHEDULE AVAILABLE TO THE COMMISSIONER UPON REQUEST.
(V) UNLESS RETENTION OF THE PERSONAL DATA IS OTHERWISE
REQUIRED BY LAW, A PROCESSOR IN POSSESSION OF A CONSUMER'S
PERSONAL DATA PROVIDED BY A LICENSEE SHALL DELETE THAT DATA AS
OF THE DATE SPECIFIED IN THE CONTRACT BETWEEN THE LICENSEE AND A
THIRD-PARTY SERVICE PROVIDER, OR UPON THE CONCLUSION OF THE
PROVISION OF SERVICES, UNLESS THE LICENSEE SPECIFIES AN EARLIER
DESTRUCTION DATE.
(VI) THIS SUBSECTION (11)(b) DOES NOT PERMIT OR REQUIRE THE
DELETION OF A RECORD THAT IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO BE RETAINED.
(12) Adverse underwriting decision - consumer rights.
(a) (I) IN THE EVENT OF AN ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION
RELATING TO A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE TRANSACTION, THE LICENSEE
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE DECISION SHALL PROVIDE IN WRITING TO THE
CONSUMER AT THE CONSUMER'S ADDRESS OF RECORD AND, IF KNOWN, THE
EMAIL ADDRESS OF THE CONSUMER:
(A) THE SPECIFIC REASON OR REASONS FOR THE ADVERSE
UNDERWRITING DECISION;
(B) THE SPECIFIC ITEMS OF PERSONAL, PUBLICLY AVAILABLE, OR
PRIVILEGED DATA THAT SUPPORT THOSE REASONS, INCLUDING THE NAMES
AND ADDRESSES OF THE SOURCES THAT SUPPLIED THE DATA THAT
-30- HB26-1091

RESULTED IN THE ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION;
(C) A LIST IDENTIFYING WITH REASONABLE SPECIFICITY ANY
SYSTEMS, PROCESSES, POLICIES, OR PROCEDURES INVOLVED IN
GENERATING DATA THAT RESULTED IN THE ADVERSE UNDERWRITING
DECISION; AND
(D) A SUMMARY OF THE CONSUMER'S RIGHT TO ACCESS, CORRECT,
AMEND, OR DELETE PERSONAL DATA PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF
THIS SECTION.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (12)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS
SECTION, A LICENSEE IS NOT REQUIRED TO FURNISH SPECIFIC PRIVILEGED
DATA IF THE LICENSEE HAS A REASONABLE SUSPICION, BASED UPON
SPECIFIC INFORMATION AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW BY THE COMMISSIONER,
THAT THE CONSUMER HAS ENGAGED IN CRIMINAL ACTIVITY, FRAUD,
MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION, OR A MATERIAL NONDISCLOSURE AND
THAT THE DATA WITHHELD RELATES TO THE SUSPECTED CRIMINAL
ACTIVITY, FRAUD, MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION, OR MATERIAL
NONDISCLOSURE.
(b) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT BASE AN ADVERSE UNDERWRITING
DECISION ON:
(I) SOLELY THE LOSS HISTORY OF THE PREVIOUS OWNER OF THE
PROPERTY TO BE INSURED;
(II) PERSONAL DATA RECEIVED FROM A PROCESSOR WHOSE
PRIMARY SOURCE OF INFORMATION IS LICENSEES, UNLESS THE LICENSEE
OBTAINS FURTHER DATA INDEPENDENTLY SUPPORTING THE ADVERSE
UNDERWRITING DECISION;
(III) A PREVIOUS ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION AFFECTING
THE CONSUMER, UNLESS THE LICENSEE BASES ITS UNDERWRITING DECISION
-31- HB26-1091

ON THE UNDERLYING BASIS OF THE PREVIOUS DECISION; OR
(IV) INFORMATION THAT THE CONSUMER INQUIRED ABOUT THE
NATURE OR SCOPE OF COVERAGE UNDER A POLICY AND THE INQUIRY DID
NOT RESULT IN THE FILING OF A CLAIM.
(c) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ASSIST A CONSUMER WITH OBTAINING
INFORMATION ABOUT AN ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISION AFFECTING
THE CONSUMER. THE COMMISSIONER MAY REQUEST INFORMATION
REGARDING SYSTEMS, PROCESSES, POLICIES, OR PROCEDURES RESPONSIBLE
FOR GENERATING THE DATA THAT RESULTED IN THE ADVERSE
UNDERWRITING DECISION. INFORMATION RECEIVED ABOUT SYSTEMS,
PROCESSES, POLICIES, OR PROCEDURES IS CONFIDENTIAL AND IS EXEMPT
FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION AND COPYING UNDER THE "COLORADO OPEN
RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
(d) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS ARE
NOT ADVERSE UNDERWRITING DECISIONS, BUT THE LICENSEE RESPONSIBLE
FOR TAKING THE ACTION SHALL PROVIDE THE CONSUMER WITH THE
SPECIFIC REASON OR REASONS FOR THE ACTION IN WRITING:
(I) THE TERMINATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL POLICY FORM ON A
CLASS-WIDE OR STATEWIDE BASIS;
(II) A DENIAL OF INSURANCE COVERAGE SOLELY BECAUSE THE
COVERAGE IS NOT AVAILABLE ON A CLASS-WIDE OR STATEWIDE BASIS; OR
(III) IF REQUESTED BY A CONSUMER, ANY INSURER-INITIATED
INCREASE IN THE PREMIUM ON AN INSURANCE PRODUCT PURCHASED BY
THE CONSUMER.
(13) Nonretaliation for exercise of privacy rights. A LICENSEE
OR PROCESSOR SHALL NOT RETALIATE AGAINST A CONSUMER BECAUSE THE
CONSUMER EXERCISED OR ATTEMPTED TO EXERCISE THE CONSUMER'S
-32- HB26-1091

RIGHTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR
RETALIATES AGAINST A CONSUMER IF THE LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR, AS A
RESULT OF A CONSUMER'S PRIVACY CHOICES:
(a) INFRINGES UPON A RIGHT, OR IMPAIRS OR IMPEDES A BENEFIT
OR PROTECTION, THAT IS AFFORDED TO CONSUMERS UNDER THIS SECTION;
(b) REQUIRES THE CONSUMER TO CONSENT TO THE SHARING OR
SALE OF PERSONAL DATA FOR A PURPOSE UNRELATED TO AN INSURANCE
TRANSACTION TO OBTAIN A PARTICULAR PRODUCT, COVERAGE, RATE, OR
SERVICE, AND THE PERSONAL DATA IS NOT NECESSARY FOR THE PROVISION
OF THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(c) IMPOSES A FEE OR CHARGE FOR THE CONSUMER TO EXERCISE
THEIR RIGHTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; OR
(d) CHARGES A DIFFERENT RATE OR PREMIUM TO THE CONSUMER,
PROVIDES A DIFFERENT INSURANCE PRODUCT TO THE CONSUMER, REFUSES
TO WRITE INSURANCE COVERAGE FOR THE CONSUMER, OR DENIES A CLAIM
UNDER AN INSURANCE PRODUCT PURCHASED BY THE CONSUMER.
(14) Data protection assessments - definition.
(a) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT CONDUCT PROCESSING THAT PRESENTS
A HEIGHTENED RISK OF HARM TO A CONSUMER WITHOUT CONDUCTING AND
DOCUMENTING A DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENT OF THE LICENSEE'S
PROCESSING ACTIVITIES THAT INVOLVE PERSONAL DATA ACQUIRED ON OR
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, AND THAT PRESENT A HEIGHTENED RISK OF HARM
TO A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE CONSUMER.
(b) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (14), "PROCESSING THAT
PRESENTS A HEIGHTENED RISK OF HARM TO A CONSUMER" INCLUDES:
(I) PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA FOR PURPOSES OF TARGETED
ADVERTISING OR FOR PROFILING, IF THE PROFILING PRESENTS A
-33- HB26-1091

REASONABLY FORESEEABLE RISK OF:
(A) UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE TREATMENT OF, OR UNLAWFUL
DISPARATE IMPACT ON, A CONSUMER; OR
(B) FINANCIAL INJURY TO A CONSUMER, INCLUDING ADVERSE
UNDERWRITING DECISIONS;
(II) SELLING PERSONAL DATA; OR
(III) PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA.
(c) DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENTS MUST IDENTIFY THE BENEFITS
THAT MAY FLOW, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, FROM THE PROCESSING TO
THE LICENSEE, THE CONSUMER, OTHER STAKEHOLDERS, AND THE PUBLIC
AND WEIGH THESE BENEFITS AGAINST THE POTENTIAL RISKS TO THE
RIGHTS OF THE CONSUMER ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROCESSING, AS
MITIGATED BY SAFEGUARDS THAT THE LICENSEE CAN EMPLOY TO REDUCE
THE RISKS. THE LICENSEE SHALL FACTOR INTO THIS ASSESSMENT THE USE
OF DE-IDENTIFIED DATA AND THE REASONABLE EXPECTATIONS OF
CONSUMERS, AS WELL AS THE CONTEXT OF THE PROCESSING AND THE
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE LICENSEE AND THE CONSUMER WHOSE
PERSONAL DATA WILL BE PROCESSED.
(d) A LICENSEE SHALL MAKE A DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENT
AVAILABLE TO THE COMMISSIONER UPON REQUEST. THE COMMISSIONER
MAY EVALUATE THE DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENT FOR COMPLIANCE BY
A LICENSEE WITH THE DUTIES OF THE LICENSEE PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION. DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENTS ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND
EXEMPT FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION AND COPYING UNDER THE "COLORADO
OPEN RECORDS ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24. THE
DISCLOSURE OF A DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENT PURSUANT TO A
REQUEST FROM THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (14) DOES
-34- HB26-1091

NOT CONSTITUTE A WAIVER OF ANY PRIVILEGE OR PROTECTION THAT
MIGHT OTHERWISE EXIST WITH RESPECT TO THE ASSESSMENT AND ANY
INFORMATION CONTAINED IN THE ASSESSMENT.
(e) A SINGLE DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENT MAY ADDRESS A
COMPARABLE SET OF PROCESSING OPERATIONS THAT INCLUDE SIMILAR
ACTIVITIES.
(f) DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENTS APPLY TO PROCESSING
ACTIVITIES CREATED OR GENERATED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, AND
ARE NOT RETROACTIVE.
(15) Rules. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT RULES NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE RIGHTS AND PROTECTIONS
AFFORDED TO HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE CONSUMERS AND THE
RESPONSIBILITIES OF PERSONS INVOLVED IN HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
TRANSACTIONS.
(16) Enforcement - investigation by commissioner - penalties.
(a) THE COMMISSIONER MAY USE ANY OF THE COMMISSIONER'S
ENFORCEMENT POWERS TO OBTAIN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION. TO
DETERMINE WHETHER A LICENSEE OR A PROCESSOR CONTRACTED WITH A
LICENSEE HAS BEEN OR IS ENGAGED IN ANY CONDUCT IN VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER MAY EXAMINE AND INVESTIGATE THE
BUSINESS PRACTICES OF A LICENSEE OR PROCESSOR TRANSACTING
BUSINESS IN THIS STATE OR TRANSACTING BUSINESS OUTSIDE OF THIS
STATE THAT HAVE AN EFFECT ON A CONSUMER RESIDING IN THIS STATE.
(b) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT
OR PRACTICE IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION
10-3-1104 (1)(uu) AND IS SUBJECT TO SECTIONS 10-3-1106 TO 10-3-1113.
(17) Consumer - private right of action - damages.
-35- HB26-1091

(a) IN ADDITION TO OTHER REMEDIES PROVIDED AT LAW OR IN
EQUITY, A CONSUMER AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTIONS (4) TO
(13) OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION ON BEHALF OF THEMSELF
OR A GROUP OF SIMILARLY SITUATED CONSUMERS TO RESTRAIN FURTHER
VIOLATIONS AND TO RECOVER DAMAGES, COSTS, AND REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES, INCLUDING THE GREATER OF:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF ACTUAL DAMAGES SUSTAINED, INCLUDING
PREJUDGMENT INTEREST EITHER OF EIGHT PERCENT PER YEAR OR AT THE
RATE PROVIDED IN SECTION 13-21-101, WHICHEVER IS GREATER, FROM
THE DATE ON WHICH THE CLAIM UNDER THIS SECTION BEGAN ACCRUING OR
THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF ACTUAL DAMAGES SUSTAINED, IF IT IS
ESTABLISHED BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON
VIOLATING THIS SECTION ENGAGED IN BAD FAITH CONDUCT OR
INTENTIONALLY VIOLATED THIS SECTION; OR
(II) THREE THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION, WITH EACH VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTING A
SEPARATE VIOLATION WITH RESPECT TO EACH CONSUMER AND
TRANSACTION INVOLVED.
(b) A CAUSE OF ACTION FOR DEFAMATION, INVASION OF PRIVACY,
OR NEGLIGENCE SHALL NOT ARISE AGAINST A PERSON:
(I) DISCLOSING PERSONAL OR PRIVILEGED DATA IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION; OR
(II) FURNISHING PERSONAL OR PRIVILEGED DATA TO A LICENSEE
OR PROCESSOR.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-3-1104, add
(1)(uu) as follows:
10-3-1104. Unfair methods of competition - unfair or deceptive
-36- HB26-1091

practices - rules - definitions.
(1) The following are defined as unfair methods of competition
and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:
(uu) A VIOLATION OF SECTION 10-4-125 CONCERNING
HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE CONSUMER DATA PRIVACY PROTECTIONS.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-37- HB26-1091